Utah statutes.
32B-4-416.   Unlawful permitting of consumption by minor.

(1)  A person may not permit a minor to consume an alcoholic product in a chartered bus or limousine of which the person is the owner or operator.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is an infraction.

